tr: Gürültü azaltma tipi: Aktif gürültü azaltma (ANR); Hibrit (ANR + gelişmiş yalıtım); Yok; Pasif gürültü azaltma (PNR); Diğer
lt-LT: Triukšmo mažinimo tipas: Aktyvusis triukšmo slopinimas (ANR); Hibridinis (ANR ir patobulintas sandarinimas); Nėra; Pasyvusis triukšmo slopinimas (PNR); Kita
fi: Melunvaimennuksen tyyppi: Aktiivinen vastamelu (ANR); Hybridi (ANR ja parannettu tiiviste); Ei mitään; Passiivinen vastamelu (PNR); Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta smanjenja buke: Aktivno smanjenje buke (ANR); Hibridno (ANR + poboljšano brtvljenje); Nema; Pasivno smanjenje buke (PNR); Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de redução de ruído: Redução ativa de ruído (ANR); Híbrido (ANR + vedação aprimorada); Nenhum; Redução passiva de ruído (PNR); Outro
de: Art der Geräuschreduzierung: Aktive Geräuschunterdrückung (ANR); Hybrid (ANR + verbesserte Abdichtung); Keine; Passive Geräuschunterdrückung (PNR); Sonstiges
hu: Zajcsökkentés típusa: Aktív zajcsökkentés (ANR); Hibrid (ANR + fokozott szigetelés); Nincs; Passzív zajcsökkentés (PNR); Egyéb
ja: ノイズ低減タイプ: アクティブノイズリダクション (ANR); ハイブリッド (ANR + 強化シーリング); なし; パッシブノイズリダクション (PNR); その他
cs: Typ potlačení šumu: Aktivní potlačení hluku (ANR); Hybridní (ANR + vylepšené těsnění); Žádné; Pasivní potlačení hluku (PNR); Ostatní
ko: 소음 감소 유형: 능동형 소음 감소(ANR); 하이브리드(ANR + 밀폐력 강화); 없음; 수동형 소음 감소(PNR); 기타
nb: Støyreduksjonstype: Aktiv støyreduksjon (ANR); Hybrid (ANR + forbedret forsegling); Ingen; Passiv støyreduksjon (PNR); Annet
ru: Тип шумоподавления: Активное шумоподавление (ANR); Гибридное (ANR + улучшенная изоляция); Нет; Пассивное шумоподавление (PNR); Другое
nl: Type geluidsreductie: Actieve ruisonderdrukking (ANR); Hybride (ANR + verbeterde afdichting); Geen; Passieve ruisonderdrukking (PNR); Anders
th: ประเภทการลดเสียงรบกวน: ระบบตัดเสียงรบกวนแบบแอคทีฟ(ANR); ไฮบริด(ANR+ซีลกันเสียง); ไม่มี; ระบบลดเสียงรบกวนแบบแพสซีฟ(PNR); อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος μείωσης θορύβου: Ενεργή μείωση θορύβου (ANR); Υβριδική (ANR + ενισχυμένη στεγανοποίηση); Καμία; Παθητική μείωση θορύβου (PNR); Άλλο
zh-TW: 降噪類型: 主動式降噪 (ANR); 混合式 (ANR + 強化密封); 無; 被動式降噪 (PNR); 其他
da: Støjreduktionstype: Aktiv støjreduktion (ANR); Hybrid (ANR + forbedret forsegling); Ingen; Passiv støjreduktion (PNR); Andet
pl: Rodzaj redukcji hałasu: Aktywna redukcja szumów (ANR); Hybrydowa (ANR + ulepszone uszczelnienie); Brak; Pasywna redukcja szumów (PNR); Inne
sv: Typ av brusreducering: Aktiv brusreducering (ANR); Hybrid (ANR och förbättrad tätning); Ingen; Passiv brusreducering (PNR); Övrigt
zh-CN: 降噪类型: 主动降噪 (ANR); 混合降噪（ANR + 增强密封）; 无; 被动降噪 (PNR); 其他
fr: Type de réduction du bruit: Réduction active du bruit (RAB); Hybride (RAB + isolation renforcée); Aucune; Réduction passive du bruit (RPB); Autre
vi: Loại giảm tiếng ồn: Giảm tiếng ồn chủ động (ANR); Kết hợp (ANR + tăng cường độ kín); Không có; Giảm tiếng ồn thụ động (PNR); Khác
ro-RO: Tip de reducere a zgomotului: Reducere activă a zgomotului (ANR); Hibrid (ANR + etanșare îmbunătățită); Fără; Reducere pasivă a zgomotului (PNR); Altele
bg-BG: Тип шумопотискане: Активно намаляване на шума (ANR); Хибридно (ANR + подобрено уплътняване); Няма; Пасивно намаляване на шума (PNR); Друго
en: Noise reduction type: Active noise reduction (ANR); Hybrid (ANR + enhanced sealing); None; Passive noise reduction (PNR); Other
pt-PT: Tipo de redução de ruído: Redução ativa de ruído (ANR); Híbrido (ANR + selagem melhorada); Nenhuma; Redução passiva de ruído (PNR); Outro
sk-SK: Typ zníženia hluku: Aktívna redukcia hluku (ANR); Hybridná (ANR + vylepšené tesnenie); Žiadne; Pasívna redukcia hluku (PNR); Iné
it: Tipo di riduzione del rumore: Riduzione attiva del rumore (ANR); Ibrido (ANR + sigillatura migliorata); Nessuna; Riduzione passiva del rumore (PNR); Altro
es: Tipo de reducción de ruido: Reducción activa de ruido (ANR); Híbrido (ANR + sellado mejorado); Ninguna; Reducción pasiva de ruido (PNR); Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta zmanjševanja hrupa: Aktivno zmanjšanje hrupa (ANR); Hibridno (ANR + izboljšano tesnjenje); Brez; Pasivno zmanjšanje hrupa (PNR); Drugo